Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1523.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Ganado water pipeline project; exemption A. The sum of $340,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the design, planning and construction costs for the Ganado waterline pipeline project. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.